Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
712

OFFENSES
AGAINST PUBLIC HEALTH AND MORALS

Part I. Prostitution and Promoting
Prostitution

Section

712-1200 Prostitution

712-1201 Promoting prostitution; definition of
terms

712-1202 Promoting prostitution in the first degree

712-1203 Promoting prostitution in the second
degree

712-1204, 1205 Repealed

712-1206 Loitering for the purpose of engaging
in or

advancing prostitution

712-1207 Street solicitation of prostitution;
designated

areas

712-1208 Promoting travel for prostitution

712-1209 Solicitation of prostitution near
schools or

public parks

712-1209.1 Solicitation of a minor for
prostitution

712-1209.5 Habitual solicitation of prostitution

712-1209.6 Prostitution; motion to vacate
conviction

Part II. Offenses Related to Obscenity

712-1210 Definitions of terms in this part

712-1211 Displaying indecent matter

712-1212 Repealed

712-1213 Displaying indecent material; prima
facie evidence

712-1214 Promoting pornography

712-1215 Promoting pornography for minors

712-1215.5 Promoting minor-produced sexual images
in the

first degree

712-1215.6 Promoting minor-produced sexual images
in the

second degree

712-1216 Promoting pornography; prima facie
evidence

712-1217 Open lewdness

712-1218 Failure to maintain age verification
records of

sexual performers

712-1218.5 Failure to maintain age verification
records of

sexually exploited individuals

712-1219 Failure to affix information disclosing
location of

age verification records of sexual
performers

712-1219.5 Disseminating visual depiction of
sexual conduct

without affixed information disclosing
location of

age verification records of sexual
performers

Part III. Gambling Offenses

712-1220 Definitions of terms in this part

712-1221 Promoting gambling in the first degree

712-1222 Promoting gambling in the second degree

712-1222.5 Promoting gambling aboard ships

712-1223 Gambling

712-1224 Possession of gambling records in the
first degree

712-1225 Possession of gambling records in the
second degree

712-1226 Possession of a gambling device

712-1227 Possession of gambling records; defense

712-1228 Gambling offenses; prima facie evidence

712-1229 Lottery offenses; no defense

712-1230 Forfeiture of property used in illegal
gambling

712-1231 Social gambling; definition and specific
conditions,

affirmative defense

Part IV. Offenses Related to Drugs and
Intoxicating

Compounds

712-1240 Definitions of terms in this part

712-1240.1 Defense to promoting

712-1240.5 Manufacturing a controlled substance
with a child

present

712-1240.6 Repealed

712-1240.7 Methamphetamine trafficking in the
first degree

712-1240.8 Methamphetamine trafficking in the
second degree

712-1240.9 Methamphetamine trafficking;
restitution and

reimbursement

712-1241 Promoting a dangerous drug in the first
degree

712-1242 Promoting a dangerous drug in the
second degree

712-1243 Promoting a dangerous drug in the third
degree

712-1244 Promoting a harmful drug in the first
degree

712-1245 Promoting a harmful drug in the second
degree

712-1246 Promoting a harmful drug in the third
degree

712-1246.5 Promoting a harmful drug in the fourth
degree

712-1247 Promoting a detrimental drug in the
first degree

712-1248 Promoting a detrimental drug in the
second degree

712-1249 Promoting a detrimental drug in the
third degree

712-1249.4 Commercial promotion of marijuana in
the first

degree

712-1249.5 Commercial promotion of marijuana in
the second

degree

712-1249.6 Promoting a controlled substance in,
on, or near

schools, school vehicles, public parks,
or public

housing projects or complexes

712-1249.7 Promoting a controlled substance
through a minor

712-1250 Promoting intoxicating compounds

712-1250.5 Promoting intoxicating liquor to a
person under

the age of twenty-one

712-1251 Possession in a motor vehicle; prima
facie evidence

712-1252 Knowledge of character, nature, or quantity
of

substance, or age of transferee; prima
facie

evidence

712-1253 Penalties under other laws

712-1254 Bar to prosecution

712-1255 Conditional discharge

712-1256 Expunging of court records

712-1257 Prohibited cigarette sales of less than
twenty

Part V. Nuisance Abatement

712-1270 Places used to commit offenses against
public health

and morals, a nuisance

712-1270.3 Citizen's rights

712-1270.5 Injunctions against persons

712-1271 Suit to abate

712-1271.5 Standard of proof

712-1271.6 Protective order

712-1272 Temporary writ

712-1273 Suit to have precedence

712-1274 Failure to prosecute

712-1275 Order of abatement

712-1276 Costs and expenses

712-1277 Owner not guilty of contempt; may pay
costs

712-1277.5 Contempt

712-1278 Fine, costs, lien on place

712-1279 Termination of lease

712-1280 Place

712-1281 Forfeiture; fireworks

Note

L 2001, c 91, §4 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Display of adult entertainment products for sale, see
§489X-1.

Habitual solicitation of prostitution, see §712-1209.5.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next